Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
CHAPTER 7 Legislative Research Commission

7.010.
Functions of Council. [Repealed.]

7.020.
Membership of Council; term. [Repealed.]

7.030.
Vacancies. [Repealed.]

7.040.
Meetings of Council — Compensation. [Repealed.]

7.050.
Production of evidence; witnesses; fees. [Repealed.]

7.060.
Obtaining information — Research — Employes. [Repealed.]

7.070.
Governor’s message; legislators may attend sessions. [Repealed].

7.080.
Reports; recommendations. [Repealed.]

7.090.
Legislative Research Commission — Membership — Vacancies — Meetings — Vote required to act — Compensation — Director — Qualifications — Personnel — Work-related incentive program — Notice of issue involving General Assembly member that may result in litigation against General Assembly or LRC — Contracts — Display of In God We Trust.

There is created a Legislative Research Commission as an independent agency in the legislative branch of state government, which is exempt from control by the executive branch and from reorganization by the Governor. The Commission shall have the duties, responsibilities, and powers assigned to it or authorized it by the General Assembly, by statute or otherwise.

The Legislative Research Commission shall be composed of the President of the Senate, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives, the majority and minority floor leaders of the Senate and the House of Representatives, the majority and minority whips of the Senate, the majority and minority whips of the House, and the majority and minority caucus chairs of the Senate and House of Representatives. Any vacancy in the Commission shall be filled by the remaining members who are of the same chamber membership and political party affiliation as the person having vacated Commission membership. If the vacancy is in the membership of the House of Representatives, the successor shall be from the House, and if the vacancy is from the Senate membership of the Commission, the successor shall be from the Senate. A member elected to fill any vacancy shall hold office for the unexpired term of his or her predecessor. The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall serve as co-chairs of the Commission.

The Legislative Research Commission shall meet during regular and special sessions of the General Assembly, and during the intervals between sessions at such times and places as the co-chairs may determine. Meetings of the Commission shall be called by the co-chairs on their own initiative, or at the written request of any three (3) members of the Commission. Any action of the Commission shall require an affirmative roll call vote of a majority of the Commission’s entire membership. For attending meetings of the Commission or any of its subcommittees whose membership consists only of members of the Commission between sessions of the General Assembly, the members of the Commission shall be paid their necessary traveling expenses and in addition thereto an amount per day equal to the per diem compensation they receive during any session. For attending meetings of interim joint committees or other Commission subcommittees, members of the Commission shall be paid an amount per day equal to that received by all other members of the committees or subcommittees who are not designated as chairs or co-chairs.

The Commission shall appoint a director, who shall be a person who has demonstrated exemplary moral and ethical leadership while holding a significant leadership position in business, government, military service, or a nonprofit organization or charity, and who shall hold office at the pleasure of the Commission. The salary of the director shall be determined by the Commission. The Commission shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the employment of personnel necessary to effectuate the provisions of KRS

7.090

to

7.110

.

Any professional, clerical, or other employees required by any committee appointed by the General Assembly shall be provided to the committee by the Legislative Research Commission. The chair of the committee shall advise the director of the Legislative Research Commission of his or her need for personnel. In the event that the personnel required by any committee cannot be met by the staff of the Legislative Research Commission, the director shall employ personnel as necessary to meet the needs of the committee, and shall fix the rate of compensation of the employees.

The director shall, at the discretion of the Commission and under its supervision and control, provide for the:

Allocation of the work and activities of all employees of the Commission; and

Implementation of a work-related incentive program for employees of the Commission using an employee suggestion system. Employees may be recognized and rewarded for submitting suggestions that result in the improvement of services or in the realization of financial savings by the legislative branch. When an employee suggestion has been adopted and resulted in financial savings to the legislative branch of government, the employee who submitted the suggestion may be compensated through a cash bonus in an amount that is the lesser of ten percent (10%) of the amount saved or two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

The director shall inform the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House, and the Minority Floor Leaders of each chamber of any personnel matter or allegation of wrongdoing involving a member of the General Assembly that has the potential of leading to litigation in which the General Assembly or Legislative Research Commission may be a party. The members so informed shall keep the matter confidential. The director shall inform the members within forty-eight (48) hours of becoming aware of the allegation or situation.

The Commission may, in effectuating the provisions of KRS

7.090

to

7.110

, contract with any public or private agency or educational institution or any individual for research studies, the gathering of information, or the printing and publication of its reports.

The Legislative Research Commission shall constitute administrative offices for the General Assembly and the director shall serve as administrative officer for the assembly when it is not otherwise in session.

The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall have the authority to approve the in-state and out-of-state per diem and expenses for members of their respective chambers.

The Legislative Research Commission shall display the national motto “In God We Trust” directly above and behind the chairman or chairwoman in each committee room used by members of the General Assembly in the Capitol and Capitol Annex and behind the dais of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the Senate. The display shall be consistent with the historic and patriotic display of the national motto located directly above and behind the dais of the Speaker of the United States House of Representatives.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 15, § 1; 1954, ch. 9, § 1; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XII, § 1; 1960, ch. 134, § 1; 1966, ch. 36; 1972, ch. 172; 1974, ch. 353, § 1; 1974, ch. 370, § 1; 1976, ch. 83, § 11, effective March 29, 1976; 1982, ch. 129, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 443, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 486, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 185, § 11, effective March 31, 2003; 2006, ch. 34, § 6, effective March 24, 2006; 2014, ch. 75, § 9, effective July 15, 2014; 2014, ch. 79, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2022 ch. 74, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

7.095.
Fees for publication — Disposition.

The Legislative Research Commission may prescribe reasonable fees for general distribution of its publications. All such fees paid to the Commission and not expressly required to be placed in other funds shall be placed in the State Treasury to the credit of a revolving, trust or agency fund account for use by the Legislative Research Commission in publishing its reports.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 46.

7.100.
Duties of Legislative Research Commission.

It shall be the duty of the Legislative Research Commission to:

Maintain in the State Capitol or State Capitol Annex for the use and information of the General Assembly, a legislative reference room and working library; collect, summarize, and index information of a legislative and governmental nature relating to legislation and legislative policies and index all bills introduced in the General Assembly. Permanent office space for the Legislative Research Commission and for the director thereof and employees or subcommittees shall be provided on the third floor of the State Capitol. When the General Assembly is not in session, the Commission shall have jurisdiction over the use of the House and Senate chambers and over the allocation of all rooms used by the General Assembly while in session. The Commission may provide for such other office space as it may deem necessary.

Make or cause to be made such investigations into statute law, legislation, governmental agencies and institutions, and matters of public policy as will aid the General Assembly in performing its duties in the most efficient and economical manner. In making such studies and investigations between the regular sessions of the General Assembly, the Commission shall give priority to those subjects requested by the General Assembly. The Commission shall promptly consider any requests of the General Assembly by bill or resolution for the creation of task forces, committees, subcommittees, or other entities for the purpose of studying or reviewing issues or subjects. Provisions of the bill or resolution to the contrary notwithstanding, the Commission, in its sole discretion, may grant or deny the request to create an entity or alternatively assign the subject matter of the proposed study or review to an existing committee or task force, including interim joint subcommittees of the Commission.

Afford to any member of the General Assembly or any committee of either house of the General Assembly such information and assistance as may be practicable in the preparation of bills, memorials, resolutions, amendments, alterations and changes thereto, and revisions and substitutes thereof, proposed to be introduced into the General Assembly.

The Commission, at the close of each legislative session, shall assume custody of all furniture, equipment, records, materials and supplies, and printed copies of bills in the possession of the clerks of the Senate and House. Immediately prior to the convening of the next session, the Commission shall transfer all furniture, equipment, materials, and supplies to the clerks of the respective houses. The Commission may, when the General Assembly is not in session, authorize the expenditure of funds appropriated to the General Assembly for the purchase, repair, or maintenance of furniture, equipment, materials, and supplies and contract for services needed by the General Assembly.

The Commission shall prepare and publish or contract for the preparation and publishing of a daily index and digest of the content of and legislative action on all measures introduced in the General Assembly.

After each election the Commission shall conduct a pre-session orientation conference for members of the General Assembly.

The Commission shall notify the members of the General Assembly of the reports filed with the Commission for distribution to the members of the General Assembly and of the reports and publications of the Commission which are available for the members of the General Assembly. Each member of the General Assembly shall indicate upon a form provided by the Commission which reports shall be forwarded to the member.

Conduct, while the General Assembly is not in session, any and all business of the legislative department of government, except for the passage of legislation, which could be conducted by the legislative department of government or the General Assembly if the General Assembly were in session.

Conduct such other business and possess such other powers and duties as may be assigned or authorized by the General Assembly by statute or otherwise.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 15, § 2; 1954, ch. 9, § 2; 1962, ch. 199; 1978, ch. 357, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 44, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 443, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 41, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

7.101.
Required sexual and workplace harassment training for General Assembly members.

The Legislative Research Commission shall require all members of the General Assembly to attend a sexual and workplace harassment training course to be held at the beginning of each session of the General Assembly. The Legislative Research Commission shall coordinate the development and presentation of the training course, with assistance of the Legislative Ethics Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 75, § 8, effective July 15, 2014; 2020 ch. 127, § 6, effective July 15, 2020.

7.103.
Interim joint committees — Monthly meeting schedule — Commission authorized to adopt new interim joint committee structure.

The monthly meeting schedule for interim joint committees of the Legislative Research Commission shall begin on June 1 and continue through December 1 of each year. During that period, upon agreement of the co-chairs, an interim joint committee shall have the authority to meet according to the most recent regular monthly meeting schedule approved by a majority of the entire membership of the Commission. With an affirmative vote of a majority of its entire membership, the Commission may alter the beginning and concluding dates of authorization granted in this subsection for regular monthly meetings of interim joint committees during the current calendar year, authorize any additional meeting of any interim joint committee, or disapprove any meeting of any interim joint committee.

The co-chairs of each interim joint committee shall have joint responsibility for approving meeting agendas and presiding at meetings. If the co-chairs of any interim joint committee cannot agree on convening a monthly meeting, each co-chair, with the agreement of the presiding officer of the co-chair’s chamber, may convene a meeting of the interim joint committee members who are members of the co-chair’s chamber. If such a meeting is convened, it shall be on the regular monthly meeting date of the interim joint committee, and it shall be staffed by the Commission. Not more than three (3) such meetings shall be convened by each co-chair in a calendar year.

Subcommittees of interim joint committees shall be authorized to meet according to the policies and practices of the Commission.

For purposes of this section, “interim joint committees” means those subcommittees of the Commission which are constituted by combining the membership of Senate and House standing committees pursuant to the most recent interim joint committee structure approved by a majority of the entire membership of the Commission. After March 31, 2003, until such time as the Commission, by an affirmative vote of a majority of its entire membership, adopts a new interim joint committee structure, the most recent interim joint committee structure adopted by the Commission shall be considered to include an Interim Joint Committee on Seniors, Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection, consisting of the members of the Senate Standing Committee on Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection and the House Standing Committee on Seniors, Military Affairs, and Public Safety.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 185, § 10, effective March 31, 2003.

7.105.
Distribution of Legislative Record.

The Legislative Research Commission shall provide and mail immediately upon publication one (1) copy of the “final executive action” issue of the Legislative Record, and one (1) copy of each interim Legislative Record, free of charge, to the main library of each county library system in the Commonwealth and to each state college or university library designated as a Kentucky cooperative library information center by the Department for Libraries and Archives. In any county that does not maintain a county library system, the Commission shall provide and mail each such issue of the Legislative Record or the interim Legislative Record free of charge to the library of the public high school in that county with the largest enrollment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 281, § 1; 1978, ch. 357, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Legislative Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 200, Pt. I, A, 2, (1) at 1764.

7.107.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

7.110

,

7.320

and

48.800

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Public agency” means every state or local office, state department, division, bureau, board, commission and authority; every legislative board, commission, committee and officer; every county and city governing body, council, school district board, special district board, municipal corporation, and any board, department, committee, subcommittee, ad hoc committee, council or agency thereof; and other body which is created by state or local authority and which derives at least twenty-five percent (25%) of its funds from state or local authority; and

“Public record” means all books, papers, maps, photographs, cards, tapes, discs, diskettes, recordings, magnetic or electronic images, optical images or other documentary materials regardless of physical form or characteristics, which are prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, received or retained by a public agency. “Public record” shall not include any records owned by a private person or corporation that are not related to functions, activities, programs, or operations funded by state or local authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 131, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

7.110.
Power to secure information — Coercing production of evidence — Cooperation of other agencies — Cooperation with other states — Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws — Subcommittee and citizens’ committee reports and recommendations.

The Commission, its co-chairmen or director, any other member of the General Assembly authorized by the director, or any employee authorized by the director, shall have access to all public records as provided in KRS

61.870

to

61.884

, of every agency, division or department of state government, and of any agency or institution, public or private, which has been the recipient of public funds. The Commission, its co-chairmen or director, any other member of the General Assembly authorized by the director, or any employee authorized by the director, may utilize automated data processing procedures and equipment in the accession of public records, if such records exist in machine readable form. To effect the purposes of this section, the Commission shall promulgate such rules and regulations relating to the accession of public records as are necessary. The Commission, its co-chairmen or director, any other member of the General Assembly authorized by the director, or any employee authorized by the director, may require information on oath of any person touching any matter which he is instructed to investigate, study or audit, and shall have the power to subpoena witnesses and records for such purpose, and otherwise compel the giving of evidence of any matter under study. If any person fails or refuses to testify or furnish documentary evidence concerning any matter with respect to which the Commission desires information pertaining to the studies in which it is engaged, the Franklin Circuit Court, on application of the Commission, may compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of a subpoena issued from the Circuit Court or a refusal to testify therein. Every witness so subpoenaed under this section shall receive for his attendance the fee and mileage provided for witnesses in civil cases in Circuit Court, which shall be audited and paid upon the presentation of proper vouchers sworn to by the witness and approved by the Commission.

All state agencies and institutions shall cooperate with the Commission to effectuate the purposes of KRS

7.090

to

7.110

and shall submit copies of their annual or biennial reports to the Commission.

The Commission shall encourage and arrange conferences with officials of other states and of other units of government; carry forward the participation of this state as a member of the Council of State Governments, both regionally and nationally, and formulate proposals for cooperation between this state and other states. The Legislative Research Commission shall function as Kentucky’s commission on interstate cooperation in carrying out the program of the Council of State Governments as it relates to Kentucky.

The Commission shall designate persons to represent Kentucky at the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws. The Commission shall report the findings and recommendations of the national conference to the General Assembly. Any funds appropriated to the commissioners on uniform state laws shall be paid out on vouchers approved by the director of the Commission.

The Commission may establish such subcommittees and advisory citizens’ committees as may be convenient or desired for the proper and efficient performance of its functions. Members of the General Assembly other than those who are members of the Commission designated to serve on subcommittees shall receive the same travel allowances and compensation for attending meetings as they do for attending meetings during a session of the General Assembly, except that each General Assembly member who is a chairman of a joint interim committee of the Legislative Research Commission shall be paid, in addition to such allowances and compensation, ten dollars ($10) per day for each committee meeting that he chairs.

The Commission shall report its findings, either with or without recommendations, to the Governor of the Commonwealth, and to each member of the General Assembly at least thirty (30) days prior to the convening of each regular session of the General Assembly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 15, § 3; 1954, ch. 9, § 3; 1976, ch. 83, § 12, effective March 29, 1976; 1982, ch. 129, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 131, § 2, effective July 13, 1984.

Opinions of Attorney General.

As subsection (2) of KRS

210.235

provides that records of the Department of Mental Health [now Cabinet for Human Resources] may be disclosed as necessary to carry out the rules and regulations of state departments and agencies, it would appear that a Legislative Research Commission staff member performing the powers of this section in his official capacity would not violate said section, although care should be taken to restrict examination except where necessary and all information should be kept confidential to the greatest extent possible.

OAG 73-100

.

In view of the facts that the National Conference of Commissioners is not a state body and the commissioners are not state or public officers but rather are temporary agents for the state, the Legislative Research Commission would have constitutional authority to appoint such agents.

OAG 77-473

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Interstate cooperation, Commission to encourage, KRS

8.010

.

7.1105.
Persons with disabilities or members of their families to be included in membership of boards and committees affecting them — Prohibition against discrimination.

To ensure opportunities for participation by persons with disabilities and their families in the development of policies, support, and services that affect them:

Persons with one (1) or more disabilities, or members of their families, who may be affected by or be the subject of an advisory board, committee, commission, task force, or ad hoc committee, shall be included in the membership of each advisory board, committee, commission, task force, or ad hoc committee of the Legislative Research Commission or the General Assembly.

Persons with one (1) or more disabilities, or members of their families, shall be included in the membership of any advisory committee, board, or commission of the Legislative Research Commission or General Assembly whose mission or purpose is to make recommendations or to establish criteria for services and support for persons with disabilities or to develop standards that govern the services and support funded or administered by any state government agency.

Persons with one (1) or more disabilities shall not be discriminated against and shall be given an equal opportunity for membership on any board, task force, or commission established by the Legislative Research Commission or the General Assembly consistent with and to the extent required by the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act.

As used in this section, “disability” has the same meaning as in KRS

12.450

.

The requirements of this section shall affect all boards, committees, commissions, task forces, or ad hoc committees created on or after June 21, 2001.

For boards, committees, commissions, task forces, or ad hoc committees in existence prior to June 21, 2001, any vacancy arising on or after June 21, 2001, shall be filled pursuant to this section.

The requirements of this section shall only apply to an advisory board, committee, commission, task force, or ad hoc committee that is created specifically to develop or oversee policies or programs related to persons living with a disability or their families, except that the provisions of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section shall apply.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 336, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2001, ch. 164, § 11, effective June 21, 2001.

7.1106.
Membership on boards, task forces, and commissions and participation in programs consistent with the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act — Disability awareness program.

To ensure that Kentuckians with disabilities and their families enjoy full partnership in all programs, services, and activities throughout the Commonwealth:

Consistent with this subsection, consideration shall be given to persons with one (1) or more disabilities for membership on any board, task force, or commission established by the Legislative Research Commission or the General Assembly. Persons with one (1) or more disabilities shall not be discriminated against and shall be given an equal opportunity for membership on any board, task force, or commission established by the Legislative Research Commission or the General Assembly consistent with and to the extent required by the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act;

Individuals with disabilities shall be given an equal opportunity to participate in programs, services, and activities established by the Legislative Research Commission consistent with and to the extent required by the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act;

If not already a part of staff development training, a program shall be established within the Legislative Research Commission with a disability awareness component; and

If program evaluation criteria are utilized by the Legislative Research Commission, the criteria may include in the measures of performance, the number of individuals served by the program, service, or activity.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 164, § 10, effective June 21, 2001.

7.111.
Right of access to information, when.

The Department of Kentucky State Police, Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide access to their databases and the centralized criminal history record information system and the data contained therein to other criminal justice agencies, including criminal justice statistical analysis centers, and to the Legislative Research Commission. The right of access granted herein shall not include the right to add to, delete, or alter data without permission of the agency holding the data.

Criminal justice agencies and the Legislative Research Commission shall not make public information on an individual person’s criminal history record where such record is protected by state or federal law or regulation.

The Legislative Research Commission shall have access to information which does not identify an individual person when determined by the director of the Legislative Research Commission to be necessary for a legislative purpose.

The Legislative Research Commission shall have access to individual persons’ criminal history records subject to the following provisions:

Access shall not include information on federal offenses or convictions;

Access shall not include information on out-of-state convictions; and

Requests for the release of the information shall be approved by the Legislative Research Commission by vote at a meeting of the Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 606, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 73, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 2, effective June 26, 2007.

7.112.
Information to be provided free of charge.

Any public officer or official, agency, or organization of state or local government required or requested to furnish information or data to the Legislative Research Commission, a subcommittee, task force, or other body associated therewith shall do so without any fees or charges of any kind for the information or data or any cost associated with its gathering, processing, or production.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 231, § 2, effective July 15, 1988.

7.115.
Testimony of members of interim subcommittees of Legislative Research Commission.

The chairmen and members of the interim subcommittees of the Legislative Research Commission may, subject to the approval of the Commission, appear and testify before committees of the Congress of the United States on all matters involving federal-state relations and on matters which concern the authority or interests of the states. The chairmen and members of the interim subcommittees shall receive the same travel expenses and compensation for appearing before congressional committees as they receive for attending meetings of their respective interim subcommittees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 224, § 1; 1974, ch. 308, § 3.

7.117.
Legislative drafting communications not subject to disclosure — Application.

A member of the General Assembly is immune from disclosing in a civil or criminal court proceeding, or in an administrative or legislative proceeding, any communication:

Made by the member of the General Assembly to a member of the staff of the Legislative Research Commission, or to a member of the staff of the General Assembly, with regard to a request for legislative drafting of bills or resolutions or amendments thereto or to any information surrounding such a request; or

Received from a member of the staff of the Legislative Research Commission, or from a member of the staff of the General Assembly, with regard to a request for legislative drafting of bills or resolutions or amendments thereto or to any information surrounding such a request.

A member of the staff of the Legislative Research Commission or a member of the staff of the General Assembly is immune from disclosing in a civil or criminal court proceeding, or in an administrative or legislative proceeding, any communications:

Made to him or her by a member of the General Assembly with regard to a request for legislative drafting of bills or resolutions or amendments thereto or to any information surrounding such a request; or

Made to a member of the General Assembly with regard to a request for legislative drafting of bills or resolutions or amendments thereto or to any information surrounding such a request.

This section shall not apply to a criminal court proceeding in which a member of the General Assembly, a member of the staff of the Legislative Research Commission, or a member of the staff of the General Assembly is the subject of the proceeding, and a subpoena has been issued for the communication or related information.

The communications referenced in this section or documents related thereto are not subject to subpoena, deposition, writ of mandamus, interrogatory, or other disclosure.

Any order or subpoena purporting to compel testimony or the production of evidence which is prohibited under this section shall be unenforceable.

This section applies to a former legislator or former member of the staff of the Legislative Research Commission or General Assembly only with regard to communications made or received while a member of the General Assembly or member of the staff of the Legislative Research Commission or General Assembly. For purposes of this section, legislative interns, paid or unpaid, are considered to be members of the staff of the Legislative Research Commission or General Assembly, as applicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/24/2003). This section contains the first six subsections of 2003 Ky. Acts ch. 90, sec. 1. Under the authority of KRS

7.136

, the Reviser of Statutes has codified subsections (7) to (9) of 2003 Ky. Acts ch. 90, sec. 1, as a separate KRS section, KRS

7.119

.

7.119.
Inspection of legislative records by Kentucky resident — Request to be sent to director — Records not subject to disclosure — Review of determination.

Records in the custody of the Legislative Research Commission or the General Assembly shall be available for distribution to the public, or open for inspection by any person who is a resident of the Commonwealth.

As used in subsection (1) of this section, “records” includes bills and amendments introduced in the Senate or House of Representatives, Senate and House Journals, Acts of the General Assembly, roll call votes, final reports of committees, Kentucky Administrative Regulations, documents showing salary and expenses paid to members of the General Assembly and all employees of the legislative branch, contracts, receipts and work orders for repairs or renovations to legislative offices or facilities, items cataloged in the legislative library, the Legislative Record, and informational and educational materials offered by the public information office, including legislative videotapes and photographs, calendars, and meeting notices.

Requests for records in the custody of the Legislative Research Commission or the General Assembly set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall be directed to the director of the Legislative Research Commission, who shall determine within five (5) days, excepting Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after the receipt of the request whether to comply with the request, and shall, in writing notify the person making the request of his or her decision. A request for a review of any determination by the director regarding a request for records set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall be made to the Legislative Research Commission, which shall issue its decision within thirty (30) days of the first scheduled meeting held following receipt for review. If the Legislative Research Commission does not issue its decision on a review of the director’s determination within thirty (30) days of the first scheduled meeting held following receipt of the request for review, the review shall be considered denied.

If a request for records in the custody of the Legislative Research Commission or the General Assembly not described in subsection (2) of this section or in KRS

7.117

is made to the director of the Legislative Research Commission, those records shall not be subject to disclosure. A request for review of the denial of the disclosure shall be made to the Legislative Research Commission, which shall issue its decision within thirty (30) days of the first scheduled meeting held following receipt of the request for review. That decision shall be final and unappealable.

Once a request for records is made, and unless otherwise permitted by statute, if the Legislative Research Commission determines that a denial of disclosure related to that request was properly made, no member of the Commission, the General Assembly, or the staff of the Legislative Research Commission shall knowingly or intentionally disclose to any person the records that were the subject of the denied request. Violation of this subsection is a violation under KRS

6.734

.

If a public agency other than the Legislative Research Commission receives a request for inspection of a public record that may fall under subsection (2) of this section, the official custodian of the records for the public agency shall notify the director of the Legislative Research Commission within two (2) days of receipt of the request. The official custodian of records for the public agency that received the request shall be required to respond to the request.

If the Legislative Research Commission receives a request relating to a specific member of the General Assembly, the director shall notify that member within one (1) day of receipt of the request.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as a waiver or diminishment of any constitutional, common law, or statutory defenses, privileges, or immunities that may apply to any member of the General Assembly, legislative staff, legislative agency or entity, or any other member or employee of the legislative branch.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2021 ch. 160, § 6, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/24/2003). This section contains subsections (7) to (9) of 2003 Ky. Acts ch. 90, sec. 1. Under the authority of KRS

7.136

, the Reviser of Statutes has divided 2003 Ky. Acts ch. 90, sec. 1, into two KRS sections and has renumbered the subsections to conform with this division. The first six subsections of 2003 Ky. Acts ch. 90, sec. 1, have been codified as KRS

7.117

.